en: Fluorocarbon content: Fluoro-free; High fluorinated; Low fluorinated; Pure fluorinated; Unknown; Other
es: Contenido de fluorocarbono: Sin flúor; Alto en flúor; Bajo en flúor; Fluorado puro; Desconocido; Otro
it: Contenuto di fluorocarbonio: Senza fluoro; Altamente fluorurata; A basso contenuto di fluoro; Puro fluorurata; Sconosciuto; Altro
hr-HR: Sadržaj fluorougljika: Bez fluorougljika; Visok udio fluorougljika; Nizak udio fluorougljika; Čisti fluorougljik; Nepoznato; Ostalo
sv: Fluorocarbon-innehåll: Fluorfri; Högfluor; Lågfluor; Ren fluor; Okänd; Övrigt
lt-LT: Fluorokarbono kiekis: Be fluoro; Daug fluoro; Mažai fluoro; Grynas fluoras; Nežinoma; Kita
sl-SI: Fluorokarbonska vsebina: Brez fluora; Visoko fluorirano; Nizko fluorirano; Čisti fluor; Neznano; Drugo
pl: Fluorocarbon Treść: Bez fluorocarbonu; Wysokofluorowy; Niskofluorowy; Czysty fluorocarbon; Nieznana; Inna
el: Περιεκτικότητα σε φθοριοάνθρακα: Χωρίς φθοράνθρακες; Υψηλής περιεκτικότητας σε φθοράνθρακες; Χαμηλής περιεκτικότητας σε φθοράνθρακες; Καθαροί φθοράνθρακες; Άγνωστο; Άλλο
nl: Fluorkoolstofgehalte: Fluorvrij; Hoog-gefluoreerd; Laag-gefluoreerd; Puur gefluoreerd; Onbekend; Overige
pt-BR: Conteúdo de fluorocarbono: Sem flúor; Alta fluoração; Baixa fluoração; Fluoração pura; Desconhecido; Outro
zh-CN: 氟碳含量: 无氟; 高氟; 低氟; 纯氟; 未知; 其他
cs: Obsah organofluoridů: Bez fluorokarbonu; Vysokofluorové; Nízkofluorové; Čistě fluorové; Neznámý; Ostatní
bg-BG: Съдържание на флуоровъглерод: Без флуор; Високофлуориран; Нискофлуориран; Изцяло флуориран; Неизвестно; Друго
fi: Fluorihiilipitoisuus: Fluorivapaa; Korkeafluorinen; Vähäfluorinen; Puhdas fluori; Tuntematon; Muu
sk-SK: Obsah fluórovaných uhľovodíkov: Bez fluorokarbónu; Vysoko fluorovaný; Nízko fluorovaný; Čisto fluorovaný; Neznámy; Iné
pt-PT: Conteúdo de fluorocarbono: Sem fluorcarbono; Altamente fluorado; Baixa fluoração; Puro fluorado; Desconhecido; Outro
ro-RO: Conținut de fluorocarbon: Fără fluor; Nivel ridicat de fluor; Nivel scăzut de fluor; Fluor pur; Necunoscut; Altele
ko: 불소카본 함량: 무불소; 고불소; 저불소; 순수 불소; 알 수 없음; 기타
zh-TW: 氟碳含量: 無氟; 高氟; 低氟; 純氟; 未知; 其他
th: สารประกอบฟลูออโรคาร์บอน: ไม่มีฟลูออโร; ฟลูออริเนตสูง; ฟลูออริเนตต่ำ; ฟลูออริเนตล้วน; ไม่ทราบ; อื่นๆ
vi: Hàm lượng fluorocarbon: Không chứa fluoro; Fluorocarbon cao; Fluorocarbon thấp; Fluorocarbon nguyên chất; Không xác định; Khác
hu: Fluorkarbon tartalom: Fluormentes; Magas fluortartalmú; Alacsony fluortartalmú; Tiszta fluor; Ismeretlen; Egyéb
tr: Florokarbon içeriği: Florosuz; Yüksek florlu; Düşük florlu; Saf florlu; Bilinmiyor; Diğer
da: Indhold af fluorcarbon: Fluorfri; Højfluor; Lavfluor; Ren fluor; Ukendt; Andet
fr: Teneur en fluorocarbone: Sans fluor; Hautement fluoré; Faiblement fluoré; Fluoré pur; Inconnu; Autre
ru: Содержание фторуглерода: Без фтора; Высокофтористый; Низкофтористый; 100% фтор (чистый фтор); Неизвестно; Другое
ja: フロンコンテンツ: フッ素フリー; 高フッ素; 低フッ素; 100%フッ素; 不明; その他
nb: Fluorokarbonstoff: Fluorfri; Høyfluor; Lavfluor; Ren fluor; Ukjent; Annet
de: Fluorkohlenstoffgehalt: Fluorfrei; Hochfluoriert; Leicht fluoriert; Rein fluoriert; Unbekannt; Sonstiges